Hawaii statutes.
[§134-27] Place to keep ammunition;
penalty. (a) Except as provided in sections 134-5 and 134-9, all
ammunition shall be confined to the possessor's place of business, residence,
or sojourn; provided that it shall be lawful to carry ammunition in an enclosed
container from the place of purchase to the purchaser's place of business,
residence, or sojourn, or between these places upon change of place of
business, residence, or sojourn, or between these places and the following:

(1) A place of repair;

(2) A target range;

(3) A licensed dealer's place of business;

(4) An organized, scheduled firearms show or exhibit;

(5) A place of formal hunter or firearm use training
or instruction; or

(6) A police station.

"Enclosed container" means a rigidly
constructed receptacle, or a commercially manufactured gun case, or the
equivalent thereof that completely encloses the ammunition.

(b) Any person violating this section shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 2006, c 66, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Discussed: 911 F. Supp. 2d 972 (2012).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next